Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 3 Rural Telephone Cooperatives
46-5-88.
Merger of cooperatives.

Any one or more cooperatives (each of which is designated in this Code section as a “merging cooperative”) may merge into another cooperative (designated in this Code section as the “surviving cooperative”) by complying with the following requirements:

The proposition for the merger of the merging cooperatives into the surviving cooperative, along with proposed articles of merger to give effect thereto, shall be submitted to a meeting of the members of each merging cooperative and of the surviving cooperative, the notice of which shall have attached thereto a copy of the proposed articles of merger;

If the proposed merger and the proposed articles of merger, with any amendments, are approved by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds of those members of each cooperative voting thereon at each such meeting, articles of merger in the form approved shall be executed and acknowledged on behalf of each such cooperative by its president or vice-president, and its seal shall be affixed thereto and attested by its secretary. The articles of merger shall recite that they are executed pursuant to this part and shall state:

The name of each merging cooperative and the address of its principal office;

The name of the surviving cooperative and the address of its principal office;

That each merging cooperative and the surviving cooperative agree to the merger;

The names and addresses of the directors of the surviving cooperative; and

The terms and conditions of the merger and the mode of carrying the same into effect, including the manner in which members and shareholders, if any, of the merging cooperatives may or shall become members and shareholders, respectively, of the surviving cooperative.

In addition, the articles of merger may contain any provisions, not inconsistent with this part, deemed necessary or advisable for the conduct of the business of the surviving cooperative. The president or vice-president of each cooperative executing such articles of merger shall make and annex thereto an affidavit stating that the preceding provisions of this Code section in regard to such articles were duly complied with by such cooperative;

An application for approval of the articles of merger, including such articles and the prescribed affidavits, signed and acknowledged by the president or vice-president of each merging cooperative, shall be presented to and approved by the superior court, filed with the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the principal office of the surviving cooperative is located and with the Secretary of State, and published in the same manner as an application for incorporation. The fees to be paid at the time of such filing shall be as prescribed in Code Section 46-5-100. Upon such filing, the merger shall be deemed to be effective.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 29; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 46; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 46.

46-5-89.
Effect of consolidation or merger.

In the case of a consolidation, the existence of the consolidating cooperatives shall cease, and the articles of consolidation shall be deemed to be the articles of incorporation of the new cooperative. In the case of a merger, the separate existence of the merging cooperatives shall cease and the articles of incorporation of the surviving cooperative shall be deemed to be amended to the extent, if any, that changes therein are provided for in the articles of merger.

All the rights, privileges, immunities, and franchises, and all property, both real and personal, including, without limitation, applications for membership, all debts due on whatever account, and all other choses in action of each of the consolidating or merging cooperatives shall be deemed to be transferred to and vested in the new or surviving cooperative without further act or deed.

The new or surviving cooperative shall be responsible and liable for all the liabilities and obligations of each of the consolidating or merging cooperatives; and any claim existing, or any action or proceeding pending, by or against any of the consolidating or merging cooperatives may be prosecuted as if the consolidation or merger had not taken place; but the new or surviving cooperative may be substituted in its place.

Neither the rights of creditors nor any liens upon the property of any of such cooperatives shall be impaired by such consolidation or merger.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 30.

46-5-90.
Conversion of telephone corporation into a cooperative; consolidation of telephone corporations into a cooperative.

Any corporation organized under the laws of this state and furnishing or having the corporate power to furnish telephone service may be converted into a cooperative, and shall thereupon become subject to this part, with the same effect as if originally organized under this part, by complying with the following requirements:

The proposition for the conversion of such corporation into a cooperative, along with proposed articles of conversion to give effect thereto, shall be submitted to a meeting of the members or stockholders of such corporation or, in case of a corporation having no members or stockholders, to a meeting of the incorporators of such corporation, the notice of which shall have attached thereto a copy of the proposed articles of conversion;

If the proposition for the conversion of such corporation into a cooperative and the proposed articles of conversion, with any amendments, are approved by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds of those members of such corporation voting thereon at such meeting, or, if such corporation is a stock corporation, by the affirmative vote of the holders of not less than two-thirds of those shares of the capital stock of such corporation represented at such meeting and voting thereon, or, in the case of a corporation having no members and no shares of its capital stock outstanding, by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds of its incorporators, then articles of conversion in the form approved shall be executed and acknowledged on behalf of such corporation by its president or vice-president, and its seal shall be affixed thereto and attested by its secretary;

The articles of conversion shall recite that they are executed pursuant to this part and shall state:

The name of the corporation and the address of its principal office prior to its conversion into a cooperative;

The statute or statutes under which it was organized;

That such corporation elects to become a nonprofit telephone cooperative subject to this part;

Its name as a cooperative;

The address of the principal office of the cooperative;

The names and addresses of the directors of the cooperative; and

The manner in which members, stockholders, or incorporators of such corporation may or shall become members of the cooperative.

In addition, the articles of conversion may contain any provisions, not inconsistent with this part, deemed necessary or advisable for the conduct of the business of the cooperative, including the provisions for the issuance of nonvoting shares of stock as provided for in Code Section 46-5-67. If the articles of conversion make provision for the issuance of such shares of stock, they shall also state the manner in which members, stockholders, or incorporators of such corporation may or shall become shareholders of the cooperative. The president or vice-president executing such articles of conversion shall make and annex thereto an affidavit stating that the provisions of this Code section were duly complied with in regard to such articles;

The articles of conversion shall be deemed to be the articles of incorporation of the cooperative, and an application for approval thereof, including such articles and the prescribed affidavit, signed and acknowledged by the president or vice-president of the corporation seeking to be converted into a cooperative, shall be presented to and approved by the superior court, or the judge thereof, filed with the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the principal office of the cooperative is to be located and with the Secretary of State, and published in the same manner as an application for original incorporation. The fee to be paid at the time of such filing shall be as described in Code Section 46-5-100. Upon such filing, the conversion shall be deemed to be effective.

Any two or more corporations organized under the laws of this state and furnishing or having the corporate power to furnish telephone service may, if otherwise permitted to consolidate by the laws of this state, consolidate into a cooperative subject to this part, with the same effect as if originally organized under this part, by complying with the following requirements:

The proposition for the consolidation into a cooperative and the proposed articles of consolidation and conversion, with any amendments, shall be approved by each consolidating corporation in accordance with the statute or statutes under which it was organized and in accordance with the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section;

The articles of consolidation and conversion in the form approved shall be executed, acknowledged, and sealed in the manner prescribed in subsection (a) of this Code section and in the statute or statutes under which the consolidating corporations were organized. The articles of consolidation and conversion shall state that they are executed pursuant to this part and such statute or statutes and that each consolidating corporation elects that the new corporation shall be a cooperative. In addition, the articles of consolidation and conversion shall contain all other information required by such statute or statutes and by paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section, and may contain any provisions not inconsistent with this part deemed necessary or advisable for the conduct of the business of the cooperative. The president or vice-president executing such articles of consolidation and conversion shall make and annex thereto an affidavit stating that the preceding provisions of this Code section and of the statute or statutes under which the consolidating corporations were organized were duly complied with in regard to such articles. The articles of consolidation and conversion shall be deemed to be the articles of incorporation of the cooperative, and an application for approval thereof, including such articles and the prescribed affidavits, signed and acknowledged by the president or vice-president of each consolidating corporation, shall be presented to and approved by the superior court, filed with the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the principal office of the cooperative is to be located and with the Secretary of State, and published in the same manner as an application for incorporation. The fees to be paid upon such filing shall be as prescribed in Code Section 46-5-100. Upon such filing, the consolidation and conversion shall be deemed to be effective.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 31; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 46; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 46.

46-5-91.
Dissolution of cooperatives.

A cooperative which has not commenced business may be dissolved by presenting to the superior court of the county where its principal office is located, or to the judge of the superior court in vacation, articles of dissolution which shall be executed and acknowledged on behalf of the cooperative by a majority of the incorporators and which shall state:

The name of the cooperative;

The address of its principal office;

That the cooperative has not commenced business;

That any sums received by the cooperative, less any part thereof disbursed for expenses of the cooperative, have been returned or paid to those entitled thereto;

That no debt of the cooperative is unpaid; and

That a majority of the incorporators elect that the cooperative be dissolved.

The judge shall examine into the facts, and if he shall find the same to be true, he shall pass and enter an order that the cooperative is dissolved. Thereupon, the incorporators shall deliver the articles of dissolution and the order of the judge thereon to the clerk of the superior court of the county where the principal office of the cooperative is located, who, upon payment of the costs as set out in Code Section 46-5-100, shall deliver two certified copies of the articles of dissolution and the order of the judge thereon to the incorporators or their attorney, who shall forthwith deliver one of the copies to the Secretary of State for recording.

A cooperative which has commenced business may be dissolved in the following manner:

The proposition to dissolve shall be submitted to the members of the cooperative at any annual or special meeting, the notice of which shall set forth such proposition. The members at any such meeting shall approve, by the affirmative vote of not less than a majority of all members of the cooperative, the proposition that the cooperative be dissolved. Upon such approval, a certificate of election to dissolve (referred to in this Code section as the “certificate”), executed and acknowledged on behalf of the cooperative by its president or vice-president under its seal, attested by its secretary, and stating the name of the cooperative, the address of its principal office, and that the members of the cooperative have duly voted that the cooperative be dissolved, together with an affidavit made by its president or vice-president executing the certificate and stating that the statements in the certificate are true, shall be attached to a petition to the superior court of the county in which the principal office of the cooperative is located, or to the judge thereof in vacation, who shall examine into the facts alleged in the petition and the certificate; and if he shall find the same to be true and the relief prayed for within the purview and intent of this part, he shall grant the petition by proper order;

Upon the granting of the petition, the certificate and the order of the judge thereon shall be forthwith filed in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the principal office of the cooperative is located and in the office of the Secretary of State; and the fees for such filing as provided in Code Section 46-5-100 shall be submitted therewith. Upon such filing, the cooperative shall cease to carry on its business except to the extent necessary for the winding up thereof; but its corporate existence shall continue until the final order of dissolution has been made and entered by the judge and filed in the office of the clerk of said county and in the office of the Secretary of State. The board of directors shall, immediately upon the filing of the certificate with the order of the judge thereon in the office of the clerk of the superior court, cause notice of the dissolution proceedings to be mailed to each known creditor of and claimant against the cooperative; and the certificate and the order of the judge thereon shall be published once a week for four consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the principal office of the cooperative is located. The board of directors shall wind up and settle the affairs of the cooperative; collect sums owing to it; liquidate its property and assets; pay and discharge its debts, obligations, and liabilities, other than those to patrons arising by reason of their patronage; and do all other things required to wind up its business. After paying or discharging or adequately providing for the payment or discharge of all its debts, obligations, and liabilities, other than those to patrons arising by reason of their patronage, the board of directors shall distribute any remaining sums, first, to shareholders, if any, for the pro rata return of the par value of their shares, together with any accrued dividends; second, to patrons for the pro rata return of all amounts standing to their credit by reason of their patronage; and third, to members for the pro rata repayment of membership fees. Any sums then remaining shall be distributed among its members and former members in proportion to their patronage;

After the winding up and settling of the affairs of the cooperative, the board of directors shall authorize the execution of articles of dissolution, which shall be executed and acknowledged on behalf of the cooperative by its president or vice-president; and its seal shall be affixed thereto and attested by its secretary. The articles of dissolution shall recite that they are executed pursuant to this part and shall state:

The name of the cooperative;

The address of its principal office;

The date on which the certificate of election to dissolve and the order of the judge thereon was filed in the office of the clerk of the superior court;

That there are no actions or suits pending against the cooperative;

That all debts, obligations, and liabilities of the cooperative have been paid and discharged or that adequate provision has been made therefor; and

That the preceding provisions of this subsection have been duly complied with.

The president or vice-president executing the articles of dissolution shall make and annex thereto an affidavit stating that the statements made therein are true. An application for final order of dissolution, accompanied by the articles of dissolution and the prescribed affidavit, shall be presented to the superior court of the county in which the principal office of the cooperative is located, or to the judge of the superior court in vacation, who, upon determination that preceding provisions of this subsection have been complied with, shall grant to the cooperative a final order of dissolution. The order shall be filed in the office of the clerk of said county and with the Secretary of State, and upon such filing the dissolution shall be deemed effective. The fees to be paid at the time of the filings provided for in this subsection shall be as prescribed in Code Section 46-5-100.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 32.

46-5-92.
Operation of cooperatives on nonprofit basis; contents of bylaws and of contracts with members and patrons regarding nonprofit operation.

A cooperative shall be operated on a nonprofit basis for the mutual benefit of its members and patrons. The bylaws of a cooperative or its contracts with members and patrons shall contain such provisions relative to the disposition of revenues and receipts as may be necessary and appropriate to establish and maintain its nonprofit and cooperative character. In the case of a cooperative authorized to issue shares of stock, such bylaws or contracts shall provide that no moneys shall be paid or credits given on the basis of patronage except after the declaration or payment of dividends on the outstanding shares of stock in accordance with the articles of incorporation of the cooperative; and such bylaws or contracts shall otherwise be consistent with the cooperative’s obligations in regard to such shares of stock.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 33.

46-5-92.1.
Payment of revenues; priority of payments.

Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, upon the death of a member or former member who is a natural person, the board of directors shall have authority, but shall not be required, to pay revenues allocated but not previously paid to such member or former member.

If the member or former member dies testate, such payments shall be made to the person who is the executor of the estate of the decedent at the time of the payment.

If the member or former member dies intestate and the cooperative is provided a copy of letters of administration for the estate of the decedent, such payments shall be made to the administrator of the estate named therein.

If the member or former member dies intestate and the cooperative is not provided a copy of letters of administration of the estate of the deceased and such payment is $2,500.00 or less, such payment shall be made to the persons listed below and according to the priority indicated:

To the surviving spouse of the decedent;

If no surviving spouse, then to the surviving children of the decedent, pro rata;

If no surviving children, then to the surviving mother and father of the decedent, pro rata; or

If no surviving parent, then to the surviving brothers and sisters of the decedent, pro rata.

If the member or former member dies intestate and the cooperative is not provided a copy of the letters of administration and such payment is greater than $2,500.00, such payment shall be made to the person entitled thereto under the laws of descent and distribution of this state.

Payment to the persons listed in subsections (b) through (e) of this Code section shall operate as a complete acquittal and discharge to the cooperative from any action, claim, or demand of whatever nature for the amount so paid by any heir, distributee, or creditor of the decedent or any other person. Payment to such persons is authorized to be made as provided in subsections (d) and (e) of this Code section without the administration of the estate of the decedent and without the necessity of obtaining an order that no administration is necessary.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-92.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 352, § 9/SB 46.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2017.

46-5-93.
Pledging or encumbering of property, assets, rights, and privileges of cooperative by board of directors to secure indebtedness to federal government; tax exemption for mortgages and deeds of trust; sale, pledge, or encumbrance of property.

In order to secure any indebtedness of the cooperative to the United States government or any agency or instrumentality thereof, the board of directors of a cooperative shall have full power and authority, without authorization by the members thereof, to authorize the execution and delivery of mortgages or deeds of trust of, or the pledging or encumbering of, any or all of the property, assets, rights, privileges, licenses, franchises, and permits, wherever situated, of the cooperative, as well as the revenues therefrom, all upon such terms and conditions as the board of directors shall determine. Any such mortgage or deed of trust shall be exempt from any mortgage recordation tax imposed by this state.

A cooperative may not otherwise sell, mortgage, lease, or otherwise dispose of or encumber all or a substantial portion of its property unless such sale, mortgage, lease, or other disposition or encumbrance is authorized by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds of all the members of the cooperative, provided that notwithstanding any other provision of this part or any other provision of law, the board of directors may, upon the authorization of a majority of those members of the cooperative present at a meeting of the members thereof, the notice of which shall have set forth the proposed action, sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of all or a substantial portion of its property to another cooperative or a foreign corporation doing business in this state pursuant to this part, or to the holders of any notes, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness issued to the United States government or any agency or instrumentality thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 34.

46-5-94.
Liability of members and shareholders for debts of cooperative.

No member or shareholder shall be liable or responsible for any debts of the cooperative; and the property of the members and shareholders shall not be subject to execution therefor.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 35.

46-5-95.
Effect of recordation of mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument of real and personal property of cooperative.

Any mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument executed by a cooperative or foreign corporation doing business in this state pursuant to this part, which mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument affects real and personal property and which is recorded in the real property records in any county in which such property is located or is to be located, shall have the same force and effect as if the mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument were also recorded, filed, or indexed as provided by law in the proper office in such county as a mortgage of personal property, provided that such instrument shall be indexed on the chattel mortgage record of the county although recorded already upon the real estate mortgage record. All after-acquired property of such cooperative or foreign corporation, which property is described or referred to as being mortgaged or pledged in any such mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument, shall become subject to the lien thereof immediately upon the acquisition of such property by such cooperative or foreign corporation, whether or not such property was in existence at the time of the execution of such mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument. Recordation of any such mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument shall constitute notice and otherwise have the same effect with respect to such after-acquired property as it has, under the laws relating to recordation, with respect to property owned by such cooperative or foreign corporation at the time of the execution of such mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument and therein described or referred to as being mortgaged or pledged thereby.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 36.

46-5-96.
Construction standards.

Construction of telephone lines and facilities by a cooperative shall, as a minimum requirement, comply with the standards of the National Electrical Code in effect at the time of such construction and shall be in such manner and according to such specifications as will avoid interference with or hazards to existing telephone lines, facilities, or systems.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 37.

46-5-97.
Limitation of actions.

All rights of action accruing against any cooperative or any foreign corporation doing business in this state pursuant to this part, which rights of action grow out of the acquisition of rights of way or easements or the occupying of lands of others by the cooperative or foreign corporation, shall be barred at the end of 12 months from the date of the accrual of such cause of action. In cases where any such cooperative or foreign corporation takes possession of the lands of another without having obtained an easement or without having condemned the property and such cooperative or foreign corporation continues to use any such land of another in accordance with the rights and powers granted to the cooperative or foreign corporation by this part, and the owner of such lands takes no legal steps to prevent the occupancy of the lands by the cooperative or foreign corporation, then the rights of the owner of such lands shall be limited to whatever damages may have been caused to his realty by such occupation; and the same shall be barred upon the expiration of six months after such unauthorized occupancy begins.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 38.

46-5-98.
Taking of acknowledgments by officers, trustees, members, or shareholders of cooperatives.

No person who is authorized to take acknowledgments under the laws of this state shall be disqualified from taking acknowledgments of instruments executed in favor of a cooperative or to which the cooperative is a party, by reason of that person’s being an officer, trustee, member, or shareholder of such cooperative.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 39; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46.

Cross references.

Power of notary to take acknowledgments of any party to any written instrument executed to or by a corporation of which such notary is a stockholder, director, etc., § 45-17-12.

46-5-99.
Extension of telephone service into state by foreign nonprofit or cooperative corporations; Secretary of State as agent for foreign corporations; rights and powers of foreign corporations.

Any foreign nonprofit or cooperative corporation furnishing or authorized to furnish telephone service and owning or operating telephone lines or facilities in a state adjacent to this state may construct or acquire extensions of such lines in this state and operate such extensions without complying with any statute of this state pertaining to the qualification of foreign corporations for the doing of business in this state. Before constructing or operating such extensions, any such corporation shall designate the Secretary of State as its agent to accept service of process on its behalf, such designation to be effected by an instrument executed and acknowledged on its behalf by its president or vice president under its seal attested by its secretary and filed with the Secretary of State. Thereafter, with respect to its operation in this state, such corporation shall have only the rights, powers, privileges, and immunities of a cooperative organized under this part. In the event any process is served upon the Secretary of State, he shall forthwith forward the same by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to such corporation at the address thereof specified in the instrument executed pursuant to this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 40; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 46.

The 2004 amendment,

effective May 13, 2004, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in the second sentence of this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

46-5-100.
Fees.

Each cooperative shall be charged by the Secretary of State the fees specified in Code Section 14-2-122 for the filing of documents and issuance of certificates.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 41; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1396, § 17; Ga. L. 1987, p. 325, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 946, § 112; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1324, § 10; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-87/HB 1055.

The 2010 amendment,

effective May 12, 2010, deleted former subsection (a), which read:
“Each cooperative shall be charged by the clerk of the superior court the fee as provided in subsection (g) of Code Section 15-6-77 for the filing of incorporation proceedings.”
and deleted the former subsection (b) designation.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to §

28-9-5

, in 1988 “the” was inserted preceding “superior court” near the beginning of subsection (a).

46-5-101.
Annual license fee; exemption of cooperatives from taxation.

Each cooperative and each foreign corporation doing business in this state pursuant to this part shall pay annually, on or before July 1, to the Secretary of State a fee of $10.00 but shall be exempt from all other excise and income taxes whatsoever.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 42.

46-5-102.
Interconnection of lines, facilities, or systems of cooperatives and other telephone companies.

The lines, facilities, or systems of any cooperative or foreign corporation doing business in this state pursuant to this part and the lines, facilities, or systems of any other telephone company may, upon such terms and conditions as may be mutually agreeable to such cooperative or foreign corporation and such telephone company, be interconnected in order to provide continuous lines of communication for the subscribers of any such cooperative, foreign corporation, or telephone company. In the event any such cooperative or foreign corporation and any such telephone company shall be unable to agree upon the terms and conditions of such interconnection, including compensation therefor, the commission shall, upon the request of either party, establish terms and conditions with respect to such interconnection which shall be reasonable and nondiscriminatory.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 43.

46-5-103.
Jurisdiction of commission.

Cooperatives and foreign corporations doing business in this state pursuant to this part shall be subject to the jurisdiction and supervision of the commission in the same manner and in every respect as any other telephone company owning, leasing, or operating a public telephone service or telephone line in this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 44.

46-5-104.
Applicability of Chapter 5 of Title 10.

Chapter 5 of Title 10 shall not apply to any note, bond, or other evidence of indebtedness issued to the United States government or any agency or instrumentality thereof by any cooperative or foreign corporation doing business in this state pursuant to this part; nor shall Chapter 5 of Title 10 apply to any mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument executed to secure the same. Chapter 5 of Title 10 also shall not apply to the issuance of membership certificates, shares of stock, or any other evidence of member, shareholder, or patron interest by any cooperative or any such foreign corporation.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 45.

46-5-105.
Construction of part.

This part is complete in itself and shall be controlling. This part shall be construed liberally. The enumeration in this part of any object, purpose, power, manner, method, or thing shall not be deemed to exclude like or similar objects, purposes, powers, manners, methods, or things.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 192, § 46.